Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Chapter 03. Sovereignty of State.

Sec. 44.03.010.
Offshore water and land.

The jurisdiction of the state extends to water offshore from the coast of the state as follows:

the marginal sea to its outermost limits as those limits are from time to time defined or recognized by the United States of America by international treaty or otherwise;

the high seas to the extent that jurisdiction is claimed by the United States of America, or to the extent recognized by the usages and customs of international law or by agreement to which the United States of America or the state is a party;

submerged land including the subsurface of submerged land, lying under the water mentioned in this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 89 SLA 1959)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Effect of earthquake on tideland boundaries. — See 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Sec. 44.03.020.
Ownership of water and submerged land.

The ownership of the water and submerged land described in AS

44.03.010

is in the state unless ownership of a parcel or area is held by a person or entity by a valid and effective instrument of conveyance or by operation of law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 89 SLA 1959)

Opinions of attorney general. —

State ownership of tidelands is measured by old boundaries where sudden earthquake displacement has occurred. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

When land shifts occur by earthquake-generated avulsion, the element of suddenness creates a situation where no change occurs in the limits of state boundaries or private tracts; the old state and private boundaries, submerged or otherwise, survive. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Lands eroded from a tract which, as a result, are below mean high tide are thereby revested in the state. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Sec. 44.03.030.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter does not limit or restrict

the jurisdiction of the state over a person or subject inside or outside the state that is exercisable by reason of citizenship, residence, or another reason recognized by law;

jurisdiction over or ownership of other water or land under other water inside or forming part of the boundaries of the state;

legislative jurisdiction of the United States over an area to which legislative jurisdiction is ceded by the state and which remains in the ownership of the United States.

History.

(§ 3 ch 89 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.03.040.
Reconciliation with other statutes.

This chapter does not alter the geographic area to which a statute of the state applies if the statute specifies the area precisely in miles or by another numerical designation of distance or position.
Nothing in the statute or in this chapter is a waiver or relinquishment of jurisdiction over or ownership by the state of an area to which jurisdiction or ownership extends under another provision or rule of law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 89 SLA 1959)